Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4622
Order for child support.

If a court has issued an order granting caretaking authority under sections 43-4613 to 43-4623, or an agreement granting caretaking authority has been executed under sections 43-4608 to 43-4612, the court may enter a temporary order for child support consistent with law of this state other than the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act if the court has jurisdiction under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 22.

Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see section 42-701.